New Mexico, session 2026, HB263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 22-15E-1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2007, Chapter 44, Section 1 and Laws 2007, Chapter 239, Section 1) is amended to read: "22-15E-1. SHORT TITLE.--[This act] Chapter 22, Article 15E NMSA 1978 may be cited as the "Mathematics and Science Education Act"." SECTION 2. A new section of the Mathematics and Science Education Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT IN ADVANCED MATHEMATICS COURSES--EXCEPTIONS--REPORTING.-- A. A public school that provides advanced mathematics courses for sixth, seventh or eighth grade students shall automatically enroll a student in an available advanced mathematics course appropriate for the student's grade or abilities if the student: (1) demonstrated the highest proficiency in grade-level mathematics on the most recent statewide assessment; (2) demonstrated the highest proficiency in grade-level mathematics on an end-of-course exam or benchmark assessment administered by the student's school in the immediately preceding school year; or (3) earned at least a letter grade of A or an equivalent in the mathematics course in which the student was most recently enrolled. B. A public school is not required to automatically enroll a student in an advanced mathematics course pursuant to Subsection A of this section if the public school has notice of the student's parent's objection to the enrollment. C. In addition to the requirements of Subsection A of this section, a public school shall otherwise enroll a student in an advanced mathematics course provided by the public school upon the request of the student or the student's parent. D. Each school district and each charter school with students in sixth through eighth grade shall provide an annual report to the bureau on the following: (1) the number of the school's students in sixth through eighth grade for the current school year, disaggregated by race, sex and family income, who are: (a) eligible for automatic enrollment in an advanced mathematics course pursuant to Subsection A of this section; (b) enrolled in an advanced mathematics course and whether the enrollment was automatic or upon the request of the student or the student's parent; (c) eligible for automatic enrollment in an advanced mathematics course but are not enrolled because of the student's parent's objection; and (d) eligible for automatic enrollment in an advanced mathematics course or who requested enrollment in an advanced mathematics course but did not enroll because a course was not available; (2) the number of the school's students in sixth through eighth grade for the current school year who are not eligible for automatic enrollment in an advanced mathematics course pursuant to Subsection A of this section, but otherwise are enrolled in an advanced mathematics course, disaggregated by race, sex and family income; (3) the average score in grade-level mathematics on the statewide assessment or the end-of-year course exam or benchmark assessment and the average letter grade in mathematics for the students reported on pursuant to Paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection and for all other students enrolled in the school district or at the charter school, disaggregated by student grade level, race, sex and family income; (4) the advanced mathematics courses for sixth, seventh and eighth grade students that are available in the school district or at the charter school for the current school year; and (5) the resources, services or interventions provided by the school district or charter school to support student performance in mathematics and the number of students that received those resources, services or interventions in the current school year. E. The bureau shall compile the reports received pursuant to this section and publish the reports on the department's website; provided that the published reports shall comply with state and federal law regarding confidentiality of personally identifiable information. F. The department shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section." - 5 -